Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Chapter 43. Regulation of Entry into Alaska Commercial Fisheries.

Administrative Code. —

For commercial fisheries entry commission, see 20 AAC 05.

Legislative history reports. —

For House Resources Committee report in connection with ch. 79, SLA 1973 (SCS CSHB 126 am S), see 1973 House Journal, p. 503; for Senate Special Committee on Fisheries letter of intent, see 1973 Senate Journal Supplement no. 15.